Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,123
Certain professions and businesses; disciplinary actions; costs; how paid.

If an order issued after a hearing under section 38-1,120 or 38-1,122 is adverse to the credential holder, the costs shall be charged to him or her as in ordinary civil actions in the district court, but if the department is the unsuccessful party, the department shall pay the costs. Witness fees and costs may be taxed according to the rules prevailing in the district court. All costs accrued at the instance of the department when it is the successful party, which the department certifies cannot be collected from the other party, shall be paid out of any available funds in the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 123.